California, session 20252026, AB2795.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 25608 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:25608. (a) The commissioner shall charge and collect the fees fixed in this section and Section 25608.1. All fees charged and collected under this section and Section 25608.1 shall be transmitted to the Treasurer at least weekly, accompanied by a detailed statement thereof and shall be credited to the Financial Protection Fund.(b) The fee for filing an application for a negotiating permit under subdivision (c) of Section 25102 is fifty dollars ($50).(c) The fee for filing a notice pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (h) of Section 25102, for filing a notice pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (f) of Section 25102, or for filing a notice pursuant to paragraph (10) of subdivision (r) of Section 25102, in addition to the fee prescribed in those paragraphs, if applicable, shall be determined based on the value of the securities proposed to be sold in the transaction for which the notice is filed and in accordance with subdivision (g), and shall be as follows:Value of Securities Proposed to be SoldFiling Fee$25,000 or less$ 25$25,001 to $100,000$ 35$100,001 to $500,000$ 50$500,001 to $1,000,000$150Over $1,000,000$300(d) The fee for filing an application for designation of an issuer pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 25100 is fifty dollars ($50).(e) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by notification under Section 25112 or by permit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 (except applications for qualification by permit of the sale of any guarantee of any security, the fees for which applications are fixed in subdivision (k)) is two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold in this state up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).The fee for filing a small company application for qualification of the sale of securities by permit under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). In the case where the costs of processing a small company application exceed the filing fee, an additional fee shall be charged, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), over and above the filing fee based on the costs of the salary or other compensation paid to persons processing the application plus overhead costs reasonably incurred in the performance of the work. In determining the costs, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons processing applications for the fiscal year.(f) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by coordination under Section 25111 or a notice of intention to sell under subdivision (t) of Section 25100 is two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the aggregate value of the securities sought to be sold in this state up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).(g) For the purpose of determining the fees fixed in subdivisions (e) and (f):(1) The value of the securities shall be the price at which the company proposes to sell the securities, or the value, as alleged in the application, or the actual value, as determined by the commissioner, of the consideration (if other than money) to be received in exchange therefor, or of the securities when sold, whichever is greater.(2) Interim or voting trust certificates shall have a value equal to the aggregate value of the securities to be represented by the interim or voting trust certificates.(3) The value of a warrant or right to purchase or subscribe to another security of the same or another issuer shall be an amount equal to the consideration to be paid for that warrant or right plus an amount equal to the consideration to be paid upon purchase of the additional securities, provided that if the latter amount is not determinable at the time of qualification, that amount shall then be the value of the additional securities as determined by the commissioner.(4) In the case of a share dividend where the shareholders are given an option to accept either cash or additional shares of common stock, the value of the securities to be sold shall be the maximum amount of cash that would be payable in the event that all shareholders elected to accept cash.(h) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by permit under Section 25121 is:(1) Two hundred dollars ($200) in connection with any change (including any stock split or reverse stock split or stock dividend, except a stock dividend where the shareholders are given an option to accept either cash or additional shares of common stock) in the rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions of or on outstanding securities.(2) Two hundred dollars ($200) plus one-fifth of 1 percent of the value, as alleged in the application, or the actual value, as determined by the commissioner, of the consideration to be received in exchange therefor, up to a maximum aggregate fee of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), in any exchange of securities by the issuer with its existing security holders exclusively, or in any exchange in connection with any merger or consolidation or purchase of corporate assets in consideration of the issuance of securities, or any entity conversion transaction.(i) The fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by notification under Section 25131 shall be one hundred dollars ($100).(j) The fee for an application for the removal of any condition under Section 25141 is fifty dollars ($50).(k) The fee for filing any application for a permit to execute or issue any guarantee of any security is fifty dollars ($50).(l) The fee for acting as escrowholder for securities under Section 25149 is fifty dollars ($50). In addition, a fee of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) shall be paid for the deposit with the commissioner of each new certificate or other document resulting from a transfer in escrow.(m) The fee for filing an application for an order (1) consenting to the transfer in escrow of securities or (2) consenting to the transfer of securities subject to any condition imposed by the commissioner requiring the commissioner’s consent to the transfer is twenty dollars ($20) for each transfer.(n) The filing fee for an amendment to an application filed after the effective date of the qualification of the sale of securities is fifty dollars ($50) plus any additional fee that would have been required to be paid with the original application for qualification of the sale of securities under this section if the matters set forth in the amendment had been included in the original application.(o) (1) The fee for filing an application for a broker-dealer certificate under Section 25211 is three hundred dollars ($300).(2) Each broker-dealer shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses, reasonably incurred in the administration of the broker-dealer program under this division, as estimated by the commissioner for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the program in the year in which the assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion that the broker-dealer and the number of its agents in this state bears to the aggregate number of broker-dealers and agents in this state as shown by records maintained by or on behalf of the commissioner. The pro rata share may include the costs of any examinations, audit, or investigation provided for in subdivision (r).(3) Every broker-dealer who has secured from the commissioner a certificate shall, in order to keep the certificate in effect for an additional period, pay a minimum assessment of seventy-five dollars ($75) on or before the 31st of December in each year.(4) The commissioner may assess and levy against each broker-dealer any additional amount above the minimum assessment amount of seventy-five dollars ($75) that is reasonable and necessary to support the broker-dealer program under this division. If an additional amount is assessed, the commissioner shall notify each broker-dealer of any additional amount assessed and levied against it on or before the 30th day of May in each year, and that amount shall be paid within 20 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty in addition to the assessment of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.(5) If a broker-dealer fails to pay any assessment on or before the 30th day of the month following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the broker-dealer. If, after that order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a broker-dealer shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner; provided, however, that the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided under this division.(6) In determining the amount assessed, the commissioner shall consider all appropriations from the Financial Protection Fund for the support of the broker-dealer program under this division and all reimbursements applicable to the administration of the broker-dealer program under this division.(p) (1) The commissioner shall charge a fee of fifty dollars ($50) for the filing of a notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25210 or subdivision (b) of Section 25230.(2) The commissioner shall charge a fee up to fifty dollars ($50) to keep in effect for the following year any notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 25210 or subdivision (b) of Section 25230.(3) No person shall, on behalf of a broker-dealer licensed pursuant to Section 25211, effect any transaction in, or induce or attempt to induce the purchase or sale of, any security in this state unless the broker-dealer pays the annual fee required by paragraph (2) of this subdivision on or before the day upon which payment is due.(4) No person may, in this state, on behalf of an investment adviser licensed pursuant to Section 25231, offer or negotiate for the sale of investment advisory services of the investment adviser, determine which recommendations shall be made to, make recommendations to, or manage the accounts of, clients of the investment adviser, or determine the reports or analyses concerning securities to be published by the investment adviser, unless the investment adviser pays the annual fee required by paragraph (2) on or before the day upon which payment is due.(5) The commissioner may by order summarily enjoin an individual from performing any activity under paragraph (3) or (4) if the annual fee in paragraph (2) is not paid on or before the day upon which payment is due. An order under this paragraph may not be made before 10 days after notice by the commissioner that the fee is due and unpaid.(q) (1) Except as provided for in paragraph (2), the fee for filing an application for an investment adviser under Section 25231 is one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125), and payment of this amount shall keep the certificate, if granted, in effect during the calendar year during which it is granted. Every investment adviser who has secured from the commissioner a certificate shall, in order to keep the certificate in effect for an additional period, pay a renewal fee of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) on or before the 31st day of December.(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to a broker-dealer licensed under Section 25210.(r) (1) Except as provided for in paragraph (2), the fee for any routine or nonroutine regulatory examination, audit, or investigation is the amount of the salary or other compensation paid to the persons making the examination, audit, or investigation plus the amount of expenses including overhead reasonably incurred in the performance of the work. In determining the costs associated with an examination, audit, or investigation, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost for all persons performing examinations, audits, or investigations for the fiscal year.(2) An investment adviser licensed under Section 25230 pursuant to the Investment Adviser Registration Depository shall not be subject to paragraph (1) only in regard to the fee for a routine regulatory examination of its investment advisory services for which it is licensed under Section 25230.(s) The fee for any hearing held by the commissioner pursuant to Section 25142 shall be the sum determined by the commissioner to cover the actual expense of noticing and holding the hearing.(t) The commissioner may fix by rule a reasonable charge for any publications issued under the commissioner’s authority. The charges shall not apply to reports of the commissioner in the ordinary course of distribution.(u) The fee for filing an offer under subdivision (b) of Section 25507 shall be the amount of filing fee payable under subdivision (e), (f), (h), or (i) of this section if an application had been filed to qualify the transaction in which the securities upon which the offer is to be made were sold in violation of the qualification provisions of this law.(v) The fee for filing an application for exemption pursuant to subdivision (l) of Section 25100 is two hundred fifty dollars ($250).(w) The commissioner may by rule require payment of a fee for filing a notice or report required by a rule adopted pursuant to Section 25105. The fee required in connection with a transaction as defined by that rule shall not exceed the fees specified in subdivision (c) based on the value of the securities sold, but the commissioner may permit a single notice for more than one transaction.(x) The fee for filing the first notice of transaction under subdivision (n) of Section 25102 is six hundred dollars ($600).(y) The fee for filing a notice of transaction under subdivision (o) of Section 25102 shall be the fee for filing an application for qualification of the sale of securities by permit under paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 25113 as set forth in subdivision (e) of this section.(z) The fee for filing a notice of transaction under subdivision (h) of Section 25103 shall be six hundred dollars ($600).SEC. 2. Section 31210 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:31210. (a) It is unlawful for any person to effect or attempt to effect a sale of a franchise in this state, except in transactions exempted under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31100) of Part 2 of this division, unless that person is any of the following:(1) Identified in an application or amended application filed with the commissioner pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 31100) of this division.(2) Licensed by the Department of Real Estate as a real estate broker or real estate salesperson.(3) Licensed by the commissioner as a broker-dealer or agent pursuant to the Corporate Securities Law of 1968.(4) Registered as a franchise broker pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520).(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a), it is unlawful for a franchise broker to effect or attempt to effect a sale of a franchise in this state unless the franchise broker is registered pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520).(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), it is unlawful for a franchise broker to effect or attempt to effect a sale of a franchise in this state in a transaction exempted under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 31100) of Part 2 of this division unless the franchise broker is registered pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 31520).SEC. 3. Section 31526 of the Corporations Code is amended to read:31526. (a) It is unlawful for a franchise broker to communicate with a prospective franchisee about investing in a franchise opportunity that is subject to this law unless the franchise broker first provides to the prospective franchisee a copy of the completed Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document.(b) A franchise broker may provide the Uniform Franchise Broker Disclosure Document to a prospective franchisee through electronic means, subject to any requirements or conditions imposed by the commissioner.SEC. 4. Section 302 is added to the Financial Code, to read:302. Unless otherwise provided by rule, the commissioner shall require the use of the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry forms and instructions whenever a statute or regulation requires licensure or registration through that system.SEC. 5. Section 331.5 of the Financial Code is amended to read:331.5. (a) (1) Any person licensed by or registered with the commissioner under any law shall establish and maintain an electronic service address designated for receiving communications and documents that are sent by the commissioner to licensees or registrants. This electronic service address shall be provided to the commissioner upon licensure or registration. The electronic service address provided to the commissioner shall not be the electronic service address of any individual employee. A licensee or registrant shall have the capacity to receive an attachment that accompanies a message sent to its electronic service address, provided the size of the attachment is reasonable in relation to the technology available at the time the attachment is sent.(2) Prior to changing the electronic service address most recently provided to the commissioner, the licensee or registrant shall notify the commissioner of the change and provide to the commissioner their new electronic service address. The commissioner may impose a fine of up to fifty dollars ($50) per day, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in the aggregate, on a licensee or registrant who fails to notify the commissioner before changing their electronic service address or fails to provide the commissioner a new electronic service address.(3) The commissioner shall provide each licensee or registrant that establishes and maintains an electronic service address in accordance with this section with an electronic service address designated for receiving correspondence from licensees or registrants subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction. This service address shall have the capacity to receive an attachment that accompanies a message sent by the licensee or registrant, provided the size of the attachment is reasonable in relation to the technology available at the time the attachment is sent.(b) (1) The commissioner may fulfill any notice requirement under any law or regulation related to the levy of a fee or assessment against any licensee or registrant by sending the notice of fee or assessment to an electronic service address established and maintained pursuant to this section.(2) For any person licensed or registered through the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, the commissioner may fulfill the notice requirements described in paragraph (1) by electronic communication through that system.(c) A communication sent to an electronic service address established pursuant to this section does not satisfy any notice requirement, or displace any law or regulation, that requires notice to be served in a different manner, if a hearing right attaches to the notice.SEC. 6. Section 2042 of the Financial Code is amended to read:2042. (a) In addition to the fees provided in Section 2038, the commissioner shall levy an assessment each fiscal year, on a pro rata basis, on those licensees that at any time during the preceding calendar year engaged in the business of money transmission in California in an amount that is, in their judgment, sufficient to meet the commissioner’s expenses in administering the provisions of this division and to provide a reasonable reserve for contingencies.(b) For licensees that sell or issue payment instruments or stored value, the amount of the annual assessment on any licensee shall not exceed the sum of the products determined by multiplying (1) increments of the aggregate face amount of payment instruments and stored value issued or sold in California by the licensee, directly or indirectly through agents, in the calendar year next preceding the date of such assessment, by (2) percentages of the base assessment rate, according to the following table:Aggregate face amount of payment instruments and stored value sold (in millions)Percentage of base assessment rateFirst $1 ........................ 100.0Next $9 ........................ 25.0Next $40 ........................ 12.5Next $50 ........................ 6.0Next $400 ........................ 3Next $500 ........................ 2Excess over $1,000 ........................ 1The base assessment rate shall be fixed from time to time by the commissioner but shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) face amount of payment instruments and stored value sold.(c) For licensees receiving money for transmission, the basis of the apportionment of the assessment among the licensees assessed shall be the proportion that the total amount of money received for transmission by the licensee in California bears in relation to the total amount of money received for transmission by all licensees in California, as shown by the reports of licensees to the commissioner for the preceding calendar year. The assessment rate shall be fixed from time to time by the commissioner but shall not exceed one dollar ($1) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of money received for transmission in California by the licensee.(d) The commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount levied against it. The licensee shall pay the amount levied within 20 days. If payment is not made to the commissioner within that time, the commissioner shall assess and collect, in addition to the annual assessment, a penalty of 5 percent of the assessment for each month or part thereof that the payment is delinquent.SEC. 7. Section 8032 of the Financial Code is amended to read:8032. (a) On or before the 20th day of June of each year the commissioner shall notify each association of the amount assessed and levied against it.(b) Except as provided in this article, an association shall pay one-half or more of the amount assessed so as to be received by the commissioner not later than the 10th day of July and shall pay the remainder so as to be received by the commissioner not later than the following 10th day of January.(c) If payment is not received by the commissioner on time, the commissioner shall assess and collect in addition to the annual assessment, a penalty of 5 percent of the unpaid assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delinquent.SEC. 8. Section 12214 of the Financial Code is amended to read:12214. (a) An applicant at the time of filing an application for a license under this division shall pay to the commissioner the sum of fifty dollars ($50) as a fee for investigating the application and two hundred dollars ($200) as an application fee. The investigation fee and application fee are not refundable if an application is denied or withdrawn.(b) (1) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses, reasonably incurred in the administration of this division as estimated by the commissioner for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the programs in the year in which such assessment is made. The pro rata share shall be the proportion which a licensee’s gross income bears to the aggregate gross income of all licensees as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner. The pro rata share shall not include the costs of any examinations provided for in Section 12306, unless they cannot be collected from the licensee examined.(2) On or before the 30th day of May in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 20 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.(3) In the levying and collection of the assessment, a licensee shall not be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per year.(4) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day of June following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to such licensee. If, after such an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner; provided, however, that the revocation, suspension or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.SEC. 9. Section 17207 of the Financial Code is amended to read:17207. The commissioner shall charge and collect the following fees and assessments:(a) For filing an application for an escrow agent’s license, six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625) for the first office or location and four hundred twenty-five dollars ($425) for each additional office or location.(b) For filing an application for a duplicate of an escrow agent’s license lost, stolen, or destroyed, or for replacement, upon a satisfactory showing of the loss, theft, destruction, or surrender of certificate for replacement, two dollars ($2).(c) For investigation services in connection with each application, one hundred dollars ($100), and for investigation services in connection with each additional office application, one hundred dollars ($100).(d) For holding a hearing in connection with the application, as set forth under Section 17209.2, the actual costs experienced in each particular instance.(e) (1) Each escrow agent shall pay to the commissioner for the support of this division for the ensuing year, plus a deficit or less a surplus actually incurred during the prior two fiscal years, an annual license fee not to exceed seven thousand two hundred fifteen dollars ($7,215) for each office or location.(2) On or before May 30 in each year, the commissioner shall notify each escrow agent of the amount of the annual license fee levied against it, and that the payment of the invoice is payable by the escrow agent within 30 days after receipt of notification by the commissioner.(3) If payment is not made within 30 days, the commissioner may assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the annual license fee, of 10 percent of the fee for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.(4) If an escrow agent fails to pay the amount due on or before the June 30 following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the company.(5) If, after an order is made pursuant to paragraph (4), a request for a hearing is filed in writing and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a company shall not conduct business pursuant to this division, except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.(f) Fifty dollars ($50) for investigation services in connection with each application for qualification of any person under Section 17200.8, other than investigation services under subdivision (c) of this section.(g) A fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for the filing of a notice or report required by rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or Section 17203.1.(h) (1) If costs and expenses associated with the enforcement of this division, including overhead, are or will be incurred by the commissioner during the year for which the annual license fee is levied, and that will or could result in the commissioner’s incurring of costs and expenses, including overhead, in excess of the costs and expenses, including overhead, budgeted for expenditure for the year in which the annual license fee is levied, then the commissioner may levy a special assessment on each escrow agent for each office or location in an amount estimated to pay for the actual costs and expenses associated with the enforcement of this division, including overhead, in an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each office or location. The commissioner shall notify each escrow agent of the amount of the special assessment levied against it, and that payment of the special assessment is payable by the escrow agent within 60 days of receipt of notification by the commissioner. The funds received from the special assessment shall be deposited into the Financial Protection Fund and shall be used only for the purposes for which the special assessment is made.(2) If payment is not made within 60 days, the commissioner may assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the special assessment, of 10 percent of the special assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld. If an escrow agent fails to pay the special assessment on or before 60 days following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the company. If an order is made under this subdivision, the provisions of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) shall apply.(3) If the amount collected pursuant to this subdivision exceeds the actual costs and expenses, including overhead, incurred in the administration and enforcement of this division and any deficit incurred, the excess shall be credited to each escrow agent on a pro rata basis.SEC. 10. Section 18351 of the Financial Code is amended to read:18351. On or before the 30th day of November in each year, the commissioner shall notify each industrial loan company of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 20 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.SEC. 11. Section 23016 of the Financial Code is amended to read:23016. (a) (1) Each licensee shall pay to the commissioner its pro rata share of all costs and expenses reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, as estimated by the commissioner, for the ensuing year and any deficit actually incurred or anticipated in the administration of the program in the year in which the assessment is made.(2) The pro rata share shall be the proportion that a licensee’s total dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions made bears to the aggregate total dollar amount of deferred deposit transactions made by all licensees as shown by the annual reports to the commissioner pursuant to Section 23026.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), a licensee shall neither be assessed for nor be permitted to pay less than five hundred dollars ($500) per licensed location per year.(b) On or before the 20th day of May in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 30 days thereafter. If payment is not made within 30 days, the commissioner may assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment, of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.(c) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day of June following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the certificate issued to the licensee. If, after an order is made, a request for hearing is filed in writing within 30 days, and a hearing is not held within 60 days thereafter, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During any period when its certificate is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a certificate shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.SEC. 12. Division 15.5 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Financial Code is repealed.SEC. 13. Section 50401 of the Financial Code is amended to read:50401. (a) In addition to other fees and reimbursements required to be paid under this division, each residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee shall pay to the commissioner an amount equal to the lesser of: (1) its pro rata share of all costs and expenses (including overhead and the maintenance of a prudent reserve not to exceed 90 days’ costs and expenses) that the commissioner reasonably expects to incur in the current fiscal year in the administration of this division and not otherwise recovered by the commissioner under this division or from the Financial Protection Fund, plus a deficit or less a surplus actually incurred during the prior two fiscal years; or (2) fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000). The pro rata share shall be the greater of either three thousand dollars ($3,000) or the sum of: (A) a number derived from the ratio of the aggregate principal amount of the mortgage loans secured by residential real property originated by the licensee to all mortgage loans secured by residential real property originated by all licensees under this division, as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner, which number is then multiplied by one-half of the costs and expenses estimated by the commissioner; plus (B) a number derived from the ratio of the average value of mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by a licensee to the average value of all mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by all licensees under this division, as shown by the annual financial reports to the commissioner, which number is then multiplied by one-half of the costs and expenses estimated by the commissioner. For the purposes of this section, the “principal amount” of a mortgage loan means the initial total amount a borrower is obligated to repay the lender and the “average value” of loans serviced means the sum of the aggregate dollar value of all mortgage loans secured by residential real property serviced by a licensee, calculated as of the last day of each month in the calendar year just ended, divided by 12.In order for the commissioner to calculate the assessment under this section, each licensee shall file an annual report for the calendar year just ended containing the information required by the commissioner on or before March 1 of the year in which the assessment is to be calculated.In determining the amount assessed, the commissioner shall consider all appropriations from the Financial Protection Fund for the support of this division and all reimbursements provided for under this division.(b) In no case shall the reimbursement, payment, or other fee authorized by this section exceed the cost, including overhead, reasonably incurred in the administration of this division, and the maintenance of a prudent reserve not to exceed 90 days’ costs and expenses.(c) On or before the 30th day of September in each year, the commissioner shall notify each licensee of the amount assessed and levied against it and that amount shall be paid within 20 days. If payment is not made within 20 days, the commissioner shall assess and collect a penalty, in addition to the assessment of 1 percent of the assessment for each month or part of a month that the payment is delayed or withheld.(d) If a licensee fails to pay the assessment on or before the 30th day following the day upon which payment is due, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend or revoke the license issued to the licensee. An order issued under this section is not stayed by the filing of a request for a hearing. If, after an order is made, the request for hearing is filed in writing within 15 days from the date of service of the order and a hearing is not held within 60 days of the filing, the order is deemed rescinded as of its effective date. During a period when its license is revoked or suspended, a licensee shall not conduct business pursuant to this division except as may be permitted by further order of the commissioner. However, the revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license shall not affect the powers of the commissioner as provided in this division.SEC. 14. Section 16430 of the Government Code is amended to read:16430. Eligible securities for the investment of surplus moneys shall be any of the following:(a) Bonds or interest-bearing notes or obligations of the United States, or those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.(b) Bonds or interest-bearing notes or obligations that are issued by or fully guaranteed as to principal and interest by a federal agency or a United States government-sponsored enterprise, as defined by the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990 (Sec. 13112, Public Law 101-508; 2 U.S.C. Sec. 622(8)).(c) Bonds, notes, or other obligations of this state, or those for which the faith and credit of this state are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.(d) (1) Bonds, notes, or other obligations of a local government of this state, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A) A county.(B) A city.(C) A city and county.(D) A metropolitan water district.(E) A water district.(F) A water storage district.(G) An irrigation district.(H) A municipal utility district.(I) A school district.(2) Bonds, notes, or other obligations eligible for investment pursuant to this subdivision shall be rated in rating category of “A” or its equivalent or better by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization.(e) Bonds, debentures, or other obligations of any of the following:(1) Issued by federal land banks or federal intermediate credit banks established under the Federal Farm Loan Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2001 et seq.).(2) Issued by the Central Bank for Cooperatives and banks for cooperatives established under the Farm Credit Act of 1933, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 2001 et seq.).(3) Issued by the Federal Home Loan Bank established under the Federal Home Loan Bank Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1421 et seq.).(4) Issued by the Federal National Mortgage Association established under the National Housing Act, as amended (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701 et seq.).(5) Issued by the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation.(6) Issued by the Tennessee Valley Authority under the Tennessee Valley Authority Act, as amended (16 U.S.C. Sec. 831 et seq.).(7) Guaranteed by the Commodity Credit Corporation for the export of California agricultural products under the Commodity Credit Corporation Charter Act, as amended (15 U.S.C. Sec. 714 et seq.).(f) Bonds, notes, warrants, and other securities not in default that are the direct obligations of the government of a foreign country that the International Monetary Fund lists as an advanced economy and for which the full faith and credit of that country has been pledged for the payment of principal and interest, if the securities are rated in a rating category of “AA” investment grade or its equivalent, or better, by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization. Securities eligible for investment pursuant to this subdivision shall satisfy all of the following:(1) Be United States dollar denominated with a maximum maturity of five years or less, and eligible for purchase and sale within the United States.(2) The combined par value of all of the investments authorized by this subdivision do not exceed 1 percent of the total par value of Pooled Money Investment Account assets at the time of purchase.(3) The government of the foreign country issuing the securities submits to the jurisdiction of a federal or state court in the United States when disputes arise related to the investments.(g) (1) Commercial paper of “prime” quality of the highest ranking or of the highest letter and number rating as defined by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization that rates these securities, if the commercial paper is issued by a federally or state-chartered bank or a state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, corporation, trust, or limited liability company that is approved by the Pooled Money Investment Board as meeting the conditions specified in either subparagraph (A) or subparagraph (B):(A) Both of the following conditions:(i) Organized and operating within the United States.(ii) Having total assets in excess of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000).(B) Both of the following conditions:(i) Organized within the United States as a federally or state-chartered bank or a state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, special purpose corporation, trust, or limited liability company.(ii) Having programwide credit enhancements, including, but not limited to, overcollateralization, letters of credit, or surety bond.(2) A purchase of eligible commercial paper shall not do any of the following:(A) Exceed 397 days maturity.(B) Represent more than 10 percent of the outstanding paper of an issuing federally or state-chartered bank or a state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, corporation, trust, or limited liability company.(C) Exceed 30 percent of the resources of an investment program.(h) Bills of exchange or time drafts drawn on and accepted by a commercial bank, otherwise known as banker’s acceptances, that are eligible for purchase by the Federal Reserve System.(i) Negotiable certificates of deposits issued by a federally or state-chartered bank or savings and loan association, a state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, or a federally or state-chartered credit union. For the purposes of this section, negotiable certificates of deposits are not subject to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500) and Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 16600).(j) The portion of bank loans and obligations guaranteed by the United States Small Business Administration or the United States Farmers Home Administration.(k) Bank loans and obligations guaranteed by the Export-Import Bank of the United States.(l) Student loan notes insured under the Guaranteed Student Loan Program established pursuant to the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) and eligible for resale to the Student Loan Marketing Association established pursuant to Section 133 of the Education Amendments of 1972, as amended (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087-2).(m) Obligations issued, assumed, or guaranteed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the Inter-American Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the African Development Bank, the International Finance Corporation, the Government Development Bank for Puerto Rico, the European Bank for Reconstruction and Development, or the European Investment Bank.(n) Bonds, debentures, and notes issued by corporations organized and operating within the United States. Securities eligible for investment pursuant to this subdivision shall be rated in a rating category of “A” or its equivalent or better by a nationally recognized statistical rating organization.(o) Negotiable Order of Withdrawal Accounts (NOW Accounts), invested in accordance with Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16500).(p) Shares of any money market mutual fund subject to registration by, and under the regulatory authority of, the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, provided that all of the following conditions are met:(1) The money market mutual fund invests in securities and obligations described in one or more of the following: subdivision (a), (b), or (e) of this section or repurchase agreements or reverse repurchase agreements described in Section 16480.4.(2) The financial institution issuing shares of the money market mutual fund has at least five years of experience investing in the types of securities and obligations being purchased by the state and has assets under management in the money market mutual fund in excess of ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000).(3) The money market mutual fund has attained the highest ranking or the highest letter and numerical rating provided by not less than two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations.(4) The financial institution does not impose a commission on the purchase or sale of fund shares by the state.(5) The state does not purchase more than 10 percent of a money market mutual fund’s total assets.(6) The state does not invest more than 10 percent of the Pooled Money Investment Account’s funds in any single money market mutual fund meeting the requirements of this subdivision.SEC. 15. Section 53667 of the Government Code is amended to read:53667. (a) Expenses incurred by the administrator in carrying out the duties and responsibilities assigned to the administrator by the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53661, shall be borne by the Local Agency Deposit Security Fund, which is hereby created and continuously appropriated to the administrator for the administration of the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53661. This fund shall consist of fines levied pursuant to Section 53661, fees collected pursuant to the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53661, and assessments levied pursuant to this section.(b) Each fiscal year the administrator shall levy an assessment on a pro rata basis on those depositories which at any time during the preceding fiscal year held local agency deposits. The total assessment levied on all of those depositories shall be in an amount which, when added to the amount of fines and fees that the administrator estimates will be collected during the fiscal year when the assessment is levied, is sufficient in the judgment of the administrator to meet the expenses of the administrator in administering the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53661 and to provide a reasonable reserve for contingencies. The basis of the apportionment of the assessment among the depositories assessed shall be the proportion that the average amount of local agency deposits held by each of those depositories bears to the average total amount of local agency deposits held by all of those depositories as shown by the reports of depositories to the administrator for the preceding fiscal year, as required in subdivision (e) of Section 53661; provided, however, that the amount of the assessment levied on each of those depositories shall be not less than twenty-five dollars ($25).(c) The administrator shall notify each depository of the amount levied against it. The depository shall pay the amount levied within 20 days after such notice into the Local Agency Deposit Security Fund for the administration of the sections specified in subdivision (a) of Section 53661. If payment is not made to the administrator within such time, the administrator shall assess and collect, in addition to the annual assessment, a penalty of 5 percent of the assessment for each month or part thereof that the payment is delinquent. If a depository fails to pay the assessment or penalties assessed by the administrator, the administrator may notify local agency treasurers with deposits in the depository.SEC. 16. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.